Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1417
Commission; members; qualifications; appointment; terms; special committee.

(1) The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice shall consist of nineteen members. The membership shall include the Governor, the Attorney General, the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety, the Director of Correctional Services, the chief of police or director of public safety of a city of more than two hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census, the chief of police or director of public safety of a city of two hundred thousand inhabitants or less as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census, a county sheriff, a county attorney, a county commissioner, a mayor or city manager, a person involved with the control or prevention of juvenile delinquency, the chairperson of the Nebraska Police Standards Advisory Council, the chairperson of the Nebraska Coalition for Juvenile Justice, and six members, at least one of whom shall be a woman, from the public at large. The seven members of the council shall also be considered members of the commission acting as a special committee of the commission with limited powers and duties. A member of the commission may serve concurrently as a member of the council.

(2) The Governor may increase the membership of the commission at any time if such increase is necessary to comply with the provisions of any federal act providing funds for law enforcement or delinquency prevention purposes. Such members of the commission appointed by the Governor shall serve for terms of six years from January 1 next succeeding their appointments.

(3) Except for the Governor, the Attorney General, the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety, the Director of Correctional Services, the chairperson of the Nebraska Police Standards Advisory Council, and the chairperson of the Nebraska Coalition for Juvenile Justice, the members of the commission shall be appointed by the Governor. The membership of the commission shall represent varying geographic areas and large and small governmental subdivisions.

Laws 1969, c. 774, § 3, p. 2932;

Laws 1994, LB 971, § 11;

Laws 2002, LB 93, § 24;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 63;

Laws 2017, LB113, § 57.

The portion of this section which mandates that the Governor appoint a district court judge as a member of the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice violates the distribution of powers clause and therefore is void and unenforceable. The remainder of the section remains independently enforceable. State ex rel. Stenberg v. Murphy, 247 Neb. 358, 527 N.W.2d 185 (1995).